Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-2,108
Appropriation of water for instream flows; terms, defined.

(1) For purposes of sections 46-2,107 to 46-2,119, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(b) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; and

(c) Instream appropriation means the undiverted application of the waters of a natural stream within or bordering upon the state for recreation or fish and wildlife purposes.

(2) An instream appropriation may be obtained only by the Game and Parks Commission or a natural resources district and only for that amount of water necessary for recreation or fish and wildlife. The instream use of water for recreation or fish and wildlife shall be considered a beneficial use of water.

Laws 1984, LB 1106, § 24;

Laws 1985, LB 102, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 877, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 140;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 123.